cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/pap_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Papiamento (Curacao, Netherlands Antilles)

.group a
        a        a
        aa       a:
        ai       aI

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        k
        c (Y     s
        ch       tS

.group d
        d        d
        dj       dZ

.group e
        e        e
        ee       e:
        ei       eI
        eu       ew

.group è
        è        'E

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        g (Y     x
        gu (Y    g

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        i
        i (A     j
     A) i (K     j
        ij       eI

.group j
        j        j

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (_     N
     &) nan (_   n%an

.group ñ
        ñ        n^

.group o
        o        o
        oe       u
        oo       o:
        ou       ow

.group ò
        ò        'O

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k
        qu (A    kw
        qui      kwi

.group r
        r        R

.group s
        s        s
        sh       S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        u
        u (A     w
        ui       uj
        uu       y

.group ù
        ù        Y
        ùi       Yj

.group  ü
        ü        y
        üi       yj

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks
     _) x (A     z

.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i

.group z
        z        z
        zj       Z

.group
        '        ?
        á        ''a
        é        ''e
        í        ''i
        ó        ''o
        ú        ''u
        ç        s

        $        dOlO
